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DTC 32 Injection Pump Correction System Malfunc-
tion

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The correction system is correcting a few vary between each injection pumps.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

32 Open or short in injection pump correction unit circuit
S Injection pump correction unit circuit
S Injection pump correction unit
S Engine ECU

WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short in harness and connector between the engine ECU
and injection pump correction unit (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair harness or connector.

OK
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2 Try to change the injection pump correction unit to another one.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the injection pump correction unit from injection pump.
(b) Install the another injection pump correction unit.
(c) Clear DTC.
(d) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read DTC again.
OK:
Does not output DTC ”32” (Injection Pump Correction System Malfunction).

OK Check and replace injection pump
(See page FU−11 3).

NG

Check and replace engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .


